test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kundams_gt-norm.yaml
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундандярялемайть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундандярялемань
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундандярялемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундандярялемазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундандярялийхтень
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундандярялензе
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундандяряледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундандяряледязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундандярялине
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундандярялить
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундандярялезе
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундандярялеськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундандярялесть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундандярялезь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундандярялемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундандярялемазь
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундандярялемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундандярялемазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундандяряледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундандяряледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундандяряледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундандяряледязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундандярялине
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундандярялить
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундандярялезень
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундандярялеськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундандярялесть
     кундамс+V+TV+Cond+Conj+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундандярялезь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg1: кундалексолемайть
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg1: кундалексолемань
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg1: кундалексолемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg1: кундалексолемазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg2: кундалексолийхтень
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg2: кундалексолензе
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg2: кундалексоледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg2: кундалексоледязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcSg3: кундалексолине
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcSg3: кундалексолить
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcSg3: кундалексолезе
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcSg3: кундалексолеськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcSg3: кундалексолесть
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcSg3: кундалексолезь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl1: кундалексолемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl1: кундалексолемазь
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl1: кундалексолемасть
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl1: кундалексолемазь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl2: кундалексоледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl2: кундалексоледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl2: кундалексоледязь
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl2: кундалексоледязь
#
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg1+OcPl3: кундалексолине
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg2+OcPl3: кундалексолить
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScSg3+OcPl3: кундалексолезень
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl1+OcPl3: кундалексолеськ
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl2+OcPl3: кундалексолесть
     кундамс+V+TV+Des+Prt2+ScPl3+OcPl3: кундалексолезь
#
